Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7-140 of Title 26, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The state or a political subdivision shall not enact or


adopt any voting method that:


1. Allows qualified electors to rank candidates for any


federal, state, or local office in order of preference; and


2. Tabulates ballots cast in multiple rounds following the


elimination of a candidate until a single candidate attains a


majority.



Req. No. 3531 Page 1


B. Any ordinance enacted or adopted by a county, municipality,


school board, or other political subdivision that conflicts with the


requirements of subsection A of this section shall be void.


C. The prohibitions of this section shall not apply to the


internal processes of a political party including, but not limited


to, conventions, election of party officers, or other nonpublic


procedures by the party.


D. The Attorney General shall have the authority to enforce the


provisions of this section.


E. Any person aggrieved by a violation of this section may


bring a civil action for declaratory or injunctive relief. An


aggrieved person includes, but is not limited to, a candidate


running for office, a voter, or an election official operating under


a ranked choice election. The court may award court costs and


reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3531 BRC 1/14/2026 3:07:33 PM







Req. No. 3531 Page 2